Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB170.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 66-1227 is hereby amended to read as follows: 66-
1227. (a) The international energy conservation code 2006 (IECC 2006) is
hereby adopted as the applicable energy efficiency standard for new
commercial and industrial structures in this state.
(b) The state corporation commission may recommend energy
efficiency standards for residential, commercial or industrial structures.
The state corporation commission has no authority to adopt or enforce
energy efficiency standards for residential, commercial or industrial
structures.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a city or
county from adopting or enforcing energy efficiency standards for
structures within the jurisdiction of such city or county.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 66-1227 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.